Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2703
Health care crisis protocol; activated; when.

The health care crisis protocol may be activated only in extraordinary circumstances when the level of demand for medical services and resources exceeds the available resources required to deliver the generally accepted standard of care and crisis operations will be in effect for a sustained period.

Laws 2021, LB139, § 7.

COVID-19 Liability Act, see section 25-3601.